Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 146.003 is amended to read:
146.003. As used in ORS 146.003  to 146.189 and 146.710 to 146.992, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Approved  laboratory” means a laboratory approved by the Chief Medical Examiner as
competent to perform the blood sample analysis required by ORS 146.113 (2).
(2) “Assistant district medical examiner”  means a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677,
physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under
ORS 678.375 to 678.390 appointed by the district medical examiner to investigate and certify  deaths
within a county or district.
(3) “Cause of death” means the primary or basic disease process or injury ending life.
(4) “Death requiring investigation” means the death of a person occurring in any one  of the
circumstances set forth in ORS 146.090.
(5) “District medical examiner” means a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677, physician
associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525  or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375 to 678.390 appointed by the Chief Medical Examiner  to investigate and certify deaths within
a county or district, including a Deputy State Medical Examiner.
(6) “Law enforcement agency” means a  county sheriff’s office, municipal police department, po-
lice department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and the Oregon State Po-
lice.
(7) “Legal intervention” includes an execution pursuant to ORS 137.463, 137.467  and 137.473 and
other legal use of force resulting in death.
(8) “Manner of death” means the designation of the probable  mode of production of the cause
of death, including natural, accidental, suicidal, homicidal, legal intervention or undetermined.
(9) “Medical examiner” means a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677, physician asso-
ciate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375
to 678.390 appointed as  provided by ORS 146.003 to 146.189 to investigate and certify the cause and
manner of deaths requiring investigation, including the Chief Medical Examiner.
(10) “Medical-legal death investigator” means  a person appointed by the district medical exam-
iner to assist in the investigation of deaths within a county.
(11) “Pathologist” means a physician [ holding a current license to  practice medicine and surgery
and] licensed under ORS chapter  677 who is eligible for certification by the American Board of
Enrolled Senate Bill 536 (SB 536-A) Page 1
Pathology , or its  successor organization, as approved by the State Medical Examiner Advisory
Board.
(12) “Unidentified human  remains” does not include human remains that are unidentified human
remains that are part of an archaeological site or suspected of being Native American and covered
under ORS chapters 97 and 390 and ORS 358.905 to 358.961.
Passed by Senate March 24, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 536 (SB 536-A) Page 2